Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is  appropriated to the Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the  family and
medical leave insurance program:
(1) Shared services ......................... $ 13,709,923
(2) Family and medical leave
insurance program.................... $ 31,485,152
(3) Modernization Initiative............ $ 1,912,374
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and
moneys appropriated to the Employment Department by sections 3  and 4 of this 2021 Act,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds other than those described in  section 3 of this
2021 Act, collected or received by the Employment Department:
(1) Unemployment insurance,
shared services and workforce
operations, and workforce
and economic research ............. $181,853,638
(2) Office of Administrative
Hearings.................................... $ 34,882,041
(3) Family and medical leave
insurance program.................... $ 7,687,291
(4) Modernization Initiative............ $ 54,654,837
SECTION 3.
(1) There is appropriated  to the Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the modernization funds made available to the state on June
4, 2009, and July 16, 2009,  under section 903(f) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1103(f)),
as amended, the amount of $46,599,530 to be used for the purposes of  administering unem-
ployment compensation  law and public employment offices and for debt service and capital
improvements.
(2) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 2 (1), (3) and (4) of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 5007 (HB 5007-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. (1) There is appropriated to the  Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the Employment Department Special Administrative Fund es-
tablished in ORS 657.822, the amount  of $45,000,000 to be used for the purposes of adminis-
tering unemployment compensation law and public employment  offices and for debt service
and capital improvements.
(2) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 2 (1), (3) and (4) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$294,964,603 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds, other than those described in section 3 of this  2021
Act, collected or received by the Employment Department.
SECTION 6. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by the Employment
Department for unemployment insurance claims  from the Unemployment Compensation
Trust Fund are not limited.
(2) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by the Employment Department
for benefits  paid under the federal Trade Act and for unemployment insurance claims from
federal funds are not limited.
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 14, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5007 (HB 5007-A) Page 2